Hawaii statutes.
Rule 101 Scope. These rules govern
proceedings in the courts of the State of Hawaii, to the extent and with the
exceptions stated in rule 1101. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1]

RULE 101 COMMENTARY

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 101 only in that
"courts of the State of Hawaii" has been substituted for "courts
of the United States and before United States magistrates." Rule 1101
provides greater detail regarding the applicability of the rules in various
courts and proceedings.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next